Utah statutes.
53-3-417.   Measurable alcohol amount consumed -- Penalty -- Refusal to take
test for alcohol.
(1)  A person who holds or is required to hold a CDL may not drive a
commercial motor vehicle while there is any measurable or detectable alcohol
in his body.
(2)  The division, a port-of-entry agent, or a peace officer shall place a
person out-of-service for 24 consecutive hours who:
(a)  violates Subsection (1); or
(b)  refuses a request to submit to a test to determine the alcohol
concentration of his blood, breath, or urine.
